Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 2 Department of Transportation

Cross references. —

As to authority of department to construct and maintain airports, see §

19-7-204

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Highways, Streets and Bridges §§ 14, 86 to 90, 226 to 241.

State and local government liability for injury or death of bicyclist due to defect or obstruction in public bicycle path, 68 ALR4th 204.

17A C.J.S Contracts § 223; 39A C.J.S. Highways § 154 et seq.

§ 24-2-101.
Department and commission created; qualifications; appointment; term; removal; compensation; location of offices; power to bring civil actions; official seal.

There is created a department of transportation to consist of a transportation commission and a director of the department of transportation. The commission shall consist of seven (7) commissioners, of whom no more than seventy-five percent (75%) shall be registered in the same political party. They shall biennially elect their chairman on or after the first day of March. The commissioners shall be appointed by the governor, by and with the advice and consent of the senate, and each shall serve for a term of six (6) years. The terms of all commissioners appointed after the effective date of this section shall terminate on the last day of February of the sixth year of the term regardless of the date of the beginning of the term. The governor may remove any commissioner as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

One (1) commissioner shall be appointed from each of the following districts:

District No. 1 composed of the counties of Laramie, Goshen and Platte;

District No. 2 composed of the counties of Albany, Carbon and Sweetwater;

District No. 3 composed of the counties of Lincoln, Teton, Sublette and Uinta;

District No. 4 composed of the counties of Campbell, Johnson and Sheridan;

District No. 5 composed of the counties of Big Horn, Hot Springs, Park and Washakie;

District No. 6 composed of the counties of Crook, Niobrara and Weston;

District No. 7 composed of the counties of Converse, Fremont and Natrona.

The appointment in each district shall rotate successively among the several counties comprising the district. If any commissioner ceases to reside in, or for a continuous period of six (6) months or more is absent from the county, the governor shall declare his office vacant and shall appoint a successor from the same county in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

.

Each commissioner shall qualify by taking the constitutional oath of office, and each shall receive a salary of six hundred dollars ($600.00) per year and actual and necessary traveling expenses while away from home in the performance of the duties of office, to be paid from the state highway fund.

The commission shall maintain offices at the state capital. The commission is empowered to sue in the name of the “Transportation Commission of Wyoming”, and may be sued by that name in the courts of this state and in no other jurisdiction upon any contract executed by it. The attorney general is the legal advisor of the commission and shall prosecute and defend all actions and shall also appear in all proceedings in any federal department in which the commission is a party or is interested.

The commission shall have a seal bearing the words “Transportation Commission of Wyoming, Official Seal”, and all copies of all records and other instruments in the office of the commission, certified under the hand of its secretary with the seal affixed shall be received in any court as prima facie evidence of the original record or instrument.

Effective July 1, 1979, appointments and terms shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

The commission, department and appropriate divisions within the department may operate upon a federal fiscal year basis commencing October 1 of each year. The commission, department and all divisions within the department shall report revenues and expenditures upon a state fiscal year commencing July 1, 2010.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 3025; Laws 1927, ch. 61, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 52-101; C.S. 1945, § 48-101; Laws 1951, ch. 108, § 1; 1953, ch. 115, § 1; 1957, ch. 13, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-29; Laws 1979, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to state highway fund, see §

24-1-119

.

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20, 21, Wyo. Const.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (h).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “of whom no more than seventy-five percent (75%)” for “not all of whom” in the second sentence of (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Laws 2016, ch. 119, § 2 states as follows: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

Sovereign immunity clause.

The Governmental Claims Act repealed by implication an earlier statute authorizing suit against the state transportation commission, and therefore the commission was authorized to insert a sovereign immunity provision in its contract with paving contractor. Emulsified Asphalt v. Transportation Comm'n, 970 P.2d 858,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1998).

Suit against commission suit against state. —

Suit on road construction contract against state highway commission (now transportation commission) and its members executed by and in name of commission on behalf of the state was in effect suit against the state, and district court could have no jurisdiction on ground of diversity of citizenship in suit against state. State Highway Com. v. Utah Constr. Co., 278 U.S. 194, 49 S. Ct. 104, 73 L. Ed. 262, 1929 U.S. LEXIS 6 (U.S. 1929).

And state has not consented to suit for tort. —

Wyoming has never given its consent that it or the state highway commission (now transportation commission) might be sued for a tort. Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

Petition in action of construction contract. —

In action against state highway department (now department of transportation) on construction contract, petition was fatally defective where it did not show that claim was filed in time and with proper officer. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933); Price v. State Highway Comm'n, 62 Wyo. 385, 167 P.2d 309,

1946 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1946).

Applied

in

Awe v. University of Wyo., 534 P.2d 97,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 1975).

Quoted

in

Brasel & Sims Constr. Co. v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 655 P.2d 265,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 418

(Wyo. 1982).

Stated

in

State Hwy. Comm'n v. Brasel & Sims Constr. Co., 688 P.2d 871,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1984).

Law reviews. —

For article “Liability Insurance as Affecting Immunity from Suit,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 86.

For comment, “State Level Transportation Management,” see VI Land & Water L. Rev. 701 (1971).

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability, in negligence action, of state highway authority, 62 ALR2d 1222.

Liability of governmental entity or public officer for personal injury or damages arising out of vehicular accident due to negligent or defective design of highway, 45 ALR3d 875, 58 ALR4th 559.

§ 24-2-102.
General powers; power of eminent domain limited.

To construct, maintain and supervise the public highways of this state, the department of transportation is authorized to:

Acquire, hold and manage real property in the name of the transportation commission and to develop, improve, operate and maintain the same for any necessary public purpose. Lands acquired for rights-of-way for highways may be up to three hundred (300) feet wide and greater where extra width is necessary for:

Deposits of road building materials;

Deposits of waste materials;

Embankments;

Excavations;

Maintenance;

Parking facilities;

Roadside rest areas; and

Scenic roadside areas.

Sell, exchange, abandon, relinquish or otherwise dispose of real property including land, water and improvements for any necessary purpose in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the transportation commission, provided that disposition of water rights shall be in accordance with law.

The commission shall not acquire property by eminent domain except for highway rights-of-way as specified by subparagraphs (a)(i)(A) through (F) of this section and only if the property for those purposes is immediately adjacent to the highway right-of-way.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 70, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-30; Laws 1983, ch. 139, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, appropriates $7,000,000 from the budget reserve account to the highway fund to be expended by the transportation commission for engineering and constructing multi-lane state highways in Wyoming as identified by the department of transportation, but not including any highway that is part of the federal interstate highway system. The department is to provide a report on the use and expenditure of the funds appropriated not later than September 1, 2006 to the joint appropriations, joint transportation, highways and military affairs and joint minerals, business and economic development interim committees.

§§ 24-2-103 and 24-2-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1983, ch. 139, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1957, ch. 70, §§ 2 and 3, related to the purchase and leasing of buildings.

§ 24-2-105.
Appointment of director; qualifications; salary and expenses; powers and duties.

The commission shall submit a minimum of three (3) names of qualified candidates to the governor who shall appoint a director of the department of transportation. The director shall receive an annual salary as provided by law, payable in equal monthly installments. He shall be allowed his actual and necessary traveling and other expenses incurred in the discharge of his official duties, and shall give his entire time to the duties of his office. With the approval of the commission, the director shall have complete charge of laying out and establishing highways upon which any portion of the state highway fund is to be expended, including expenditures for roads now in existence or in the future to be constructed, which are part of the state highway system which are located within or partially within the national forests’ boundaries, and shall purchase all materials, supplies and equipment, including road-building machinery, materials, supplies and equipment, and shall employ such engineers, superintendents and employees with salaries as provided by law, as necessary for the proper performance of the duties of the department and the construction work undertaken by it. The director, with the approval of the commission, may promulgate and adopt rules and regulations as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, necessary for the proper performance of the duties and functions of the department.

Notwithstanding 1991 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 241, Section 1(a)(iv), the director of the department of transportation is authorized to regulate and control the expenditure of any administrative funds not otherwise provided by law and not specifically regulated and controlled by the transportation commission.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 2; C.S. 1920, § 3026; R.S. 1931, § 52-102; C.S. 1945, § 48-102; Laws 1957, ch. 226, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 24-3; Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 36; 1963, ch. 116, § 3; 1965, ch. 115, § 37; 1967, ch. 181, § 2; 1969, ch. 168, § 23; 1971, ch. 27, § 7; 1975, ch. 90, § 1; 1990, ch. 61, § 2; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 117, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to state highway fund, see §

24-1-119

.

As to requirement that stated salaries be paid state officers, see art. 14, § 1, Wyo. Const.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 6, which amended this section, was repealed in error by Laws 1967, ch. 136, § 671. The section which the legislature intended to repeal was Laws 1961, ch. 148, § 37, which section amended §

26-2-105

.

Laws 1991, ch. 241, § 1, referred to in subsection (b) of this section, granted approval for implementation of the department's October 15, 1990, reorganization plan.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Quoted

in

State Hwy. Comm'n v. Brasel & Sims Constr. Co., 688 P.2d 871,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 24-2-106.
Appointment of chief engineer; duties of director and engineer.

With the approval of the commission, the director of the department of transportation shall appoint a qualified chief engineer who shall:

Compile all available information relative to the public roads and bridges within the state;

Prepare standard plans and specifications for the construction of roads, culverts and bridges, and compile data relative to road and bridge materials and their values;

Furnish standard plans, specifications and data to any board of county commissioners or city or town governing body upon request, and advise with a county, city or town with respect to highway and bridge construction and improvements not within the jurisdiction of the department when requested;

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 73, § 2.

Be a licensed professional civil engineer, knowledgeable and experienced in highway and bridge construction and maintenance.

Repealed by Laws 2018, ch. 73, § 2.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 8; C.S. 1920, § 3032; R.S. 1931, § 52-109; C.S. 1945, § 48-110; W.S. 1957, § 24-34; Laws 1985, ch. 94, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1993, ch. 117, § 1; 2018 ch. 73, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2018 amendments. —

The first 2018 amendment, by ch. 73, § 1, effective July 1, 2018, in (a)(iii), substituted “commissioners or city or town governing body upon request, and advise with a county, city or town with respect to highway and bridge construction” for “commissioners upon request, and advise with boards of county commissioners with respect to highway construction.”

The second 2018 amendment, by ch. 73, § 2, effective July 1, 2018, repealed former (a)(iv), which read: “Prepare or approve plans and specifications for all bridges to be constructed by any county, city or town within the state” and former (b), which read: “No contract for the construction of a bridge is valid unless the plans and specifications have been prepared by the director of the department of transportation or the chief engineer or, if prepared by other professional engineers, the bridge designs, plans and specifications have been approved by the director or the chief engineer before the start of construction. The review and approval under this section shall be made without cost to cities, towns and counties. Final payment upon any contract shall not be made until the bridge is inspected and the payment approved by the designer of the bridge and the appropriate governing body.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Enforcement of Section 208 of the Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972 to Control Nonpoint Source Pollution,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 419 (1979).

§ 24-2-107.
Required reports.

The director of the department of transportation shall make an annual report to the commission of the transactions of the department, and on or before December first of each even-numbered year, the commission shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 9; C.S. 1920, § 3033; R.S. 1931, § 52-110; C.S. 1945, § 48-111; W.S. 1957, § 24-35; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3.

§ 24-2-108.
Road and bridge construction; professional services procurement.

All road and bridge construction work, any part of the cost of which is paid from the state highway fund, shall be performed in accordance with the plans and specifications prepared by the director of the department of transportation or the chief engineer and approved by the commission, and shall be performed by or under contracts awarded by the commission. The director with the assistance of the chief engineer shall have complete charge, including expenditures for roads now in existence, or in the future to be constructed, which are part of state highway systems which are located within or partially within the national forests’ boundaries. All improvements costing more than two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000.00) shall be constructed under contracts awarded after public notice to the lowest responsible bidder determined qualified by the transportation commission of Wyoming which is given the power to determine the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders. The commission may reject any or all bids and readvertise for bids. Improvements costing sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00) or less may be constructed by the commission upon force account, with its own forces or under contract, as the commission shall determine. A state highway construction job to be completed within any calendar year period and to cost more than sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00) shall not be constructed by department of transportation forces in sections or parcels so as to come within the sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00) limitation. Contracts may be entered into with railroad companies for the construction of grade separation structures at actual cost under terms and conditions approved by the commission. Whenever an emergency arises requiring immediate expenditure of funds for the repair or rebuilding of bridges, approaches to bridges and any roadway, when the bridges, approaches to bridges or roadway are required to be rebuilt immediately and in such short time that in the judgment of the commission the people would be seriously inconvenienced in waiting the regular period for advertising for bids, the commission may enter into contract for any building or rebuilding of bridges, approaches or roadway without advertising for the letting of any contract, provided the amount of the contract shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) and provided the commission requests proposals from at least two (2) contractors capable of performing the emergency construction or repair. The commission shall adopt general rules and regulations for the publication of notice to bidders, the awarding of contracts, and for determining the qualifications and responsibilities of bidders.

The commission shall procure the professional services of architects, engineers and surveyors in accordance with W.S. 9-23-105(f) through (h) and 9-23-106(g).

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 3; C.S. 1920, § 3027; Laws 1925, ch. 144, § 1; 1927, ch. 11, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 53-103; Laws 1935, ch. 128, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-103; Laws 1951, ch. 114, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-36; Laws 1975, ch. 92, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1994, ch. 70, § 1; 2007, ch. 119, § 1; 2020 ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to construction and improvement of public roads and highways, see art. 16, § 9, Wyo. Const.

As to bridges between counties, see §

24-1-114

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00)” for “one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00)”, substituted “forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00)” for “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00)” three times and substituted “one million dollars ($1,000,000.00)” for “five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00).”

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 29, § 2, effective October 1, 2020, in present (a), substituted “two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($275,000.00)” for “two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000.00),” “Improvements costing sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00) or less” for “Improvements costing less than forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00),” and twice in the fifth sentence, “sixty thousand dollars ($60,000.00)” for “forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00).”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 30, § 1, effective October 1, 2020, added (b).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

For analysis of dispute-resolution provisions of construction contract,

see State Highway Comm'n v. Brasel & Sims Constr. Co., 688 P.2d 871,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1984).

Changes in plans. —

Highway contract provision requiring changes in plans to be written, signed by state engineer, to entitle contractor to extra compensation was state's protection, and not available to subcontractor. Snowball v. Maney Bros. & Co., 39 Wyo. 84, 270 P. 167,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 84, 270 P. 167,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1928).

Highway contract requiring changes ordered by state engineer to be written to entitle contractor to extra compensation may be waived or modified by oral contract. Snowball v. Maney Bros. & Co., 39 Wyo. 84, 270 P. 167,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 84, 270 P. 167,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1928).

Highway subcontractor, continuing work after changes in route, accepting compensation for work and for delay, was not entitled to recover for loss of anticipated profits caused by changes. Snowball v. Maney Bros. & Co., 39 Wyo. 84, 270 P. 167,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 39 Wyo. 84, 270 P. 167,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1928).

Suit against commission suit against state. —

Suit on road construction contract against state highway commission (now transportation commission) and its members executed by and in name of commission on behalf of the state was in effect suit against the state, and district court could have no jurisdiction on ground of diversity of citizenship in suit against state. State Highway Com. v. Utah Constr. Co., 278 U.S. 194, 49 S. Ct. 104, 73 L. Ed. 262, 1929 U.S. LEXIS 6 (U.S. 1929).

Pleadings. —

In action against state highway department (now department of transportation) on construction contract, petition was fatally defective where it did not show that claim was filed in time and with proper officer. Utah Constr. Co. v. State Highway Comm'n, 45 Wyo. 403, 19 P.2d 951,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1933).

Quoted

in

Brasel & Sims Constr. Co. v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 655 P.2d 265,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 418

(Wyo. 1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

State or local governmental unit's liability for injury to private highway construction worker based on its own negligence, 29 ALR4th 1188.

Public contracts: authority of state or its subdivision to reject all bids, 52 ALR4th 186.

Governmental tort liability for detour accidents, 1 ALR5th 163.

§ 24-2-109.
Designation of state highways; vesting of county interest in state; commission authorized to acquire severed portions of land; land to be sold.

The transportation commission shall designate public highways to be known as state highways, which may coincide in whole or in part with previously established county roads. When the state highway is defined and designated by resolution entered in the records of the commission, all title and interest of the respective counties, in the road and right-of-way designated, shall pass to and vest in the transportation commission of Wyoming.

Pursuant to W.S.

24-2-102

:

Any rights-of-way for state highways not acquired from the respective counties may be acquired;

The commission shall have the authority to acquire by purchase or gift, the parcel or parcels of property that may be severed or damaged as a result of the acquisition of the highway right-of-way; provided, that the commission shall not acquire any such parcel or parcels of land by purchase or gift until full settlement has been made for the damages to the landowner as otherwise provided by law;

Any parcel of land acquired pursuant to paragraph (b)(ii) of this section and not otherwise used for highway purposes or traded for land used for highway purposes shall be offered for sale within two (2) years from the date of the completion of the project for which it was acquired. After written notice to the state building commission, the sale or disposition of this land shall be in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the transportation commission.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 4; C.S. 1920, § 3028; R.S. 1931, § 52-104; C.S. 1945, § 48-105; Laws 1953, ch. 163, § 1; 1957, ch. 11, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-37; Laws 1961, ch. 36, § 1; 1978, ch. 29, § 1; 1981, ch. 174, § 2; 1983, ch. 139, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1996, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to location, survey and construction of designated highways, see §

24-1-102

.

As to abandonment or relinquishment of portions of state highways, see §

24-3-126

.

As to the capitol building commission, see §

9-5-101

.

Power to establish highways resides primarily in the state,

to be exercised under legislative authority, subject to constitutional restriction. Ross v. Trustees of Univ. of Wyo., 30 Wyo. 433, 222 P. 3,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 31 Wyo. 464, 228 P. 642,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1924).

No more property rights shall be taken than those reasonably necessary for public use.

Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

But taking will be sustained where need within exception to300-foot limitation shown. —

If a need is established to subserve one or more of the purposes enumerated as exceptions to the 300-foot limitation, the taking must be sustained. Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

Term “maintenance” should be given a broad meaning

within this section. Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

And it must be construed in the light of the subject matter with which it is used,

and a cardinal principle to be kept in mind is, of course, legislative intent. Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

Thus, it includes weighing facilities. —

No undue liberty need be taken with the term “maintenance” to bring within its ambit facilities and provisions appropriate to and connected with the preservation of the highway, as well as its repair, and therefore facilities for control of weight restrictions should be placed in that category. Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

In considering the basic grant of power to the commission to appropriate lands for a limited access highway, including lands for maintenance, and in order to effectuate the purposes of the grant, the supreme court held that authority to include weight check stations and related facilities as an adjunct to maintaining an integrated project of the interstate system is necessarily to be implied. Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

This section permits the commission, with proper approval, to take immediate possession

after the commencement of condemnation and to start highway construction. State Highway Comm'n v. Triangle Dev. Co., 369 P.2d 864,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 371 P.2d 408,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1962).

Value is determined as of date of taking. —

It cannot be expected that the jury would appraise a strip of land with a highway constructed on it, and the court properly instructed the jury to determine the true value on the date of taking. State Highway Comm'n v. Triangle Dev. Co., 369 P.2d 864,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 371 P.2d 408,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 1962).

Burden is on condemnees to show commission's proposal is subterfugeto invoke exceptions to 300-foot limitation. —

Under the wording of this section permitting exceptions to the limitation of a 300-foot right-of-way, and the prima facie showing by the commission of compliance therewith, the condemnees have the burden to make some affirmative showing that the commission's proposal was a scheme or subterfuge to invoke the exceptions. Woolley v. State Highway Comm'n, 387 P.2d 667,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1963).

Failure to present evidence as to land not actually taken

but injuriously affected after deducting benefits accruing from highway. — See Barber v. State Highway Comm'n, 80 Wyo. 340, 342 P.2d 723,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1959).

Applied

in

Stringer v. Board of County Comm'rs, 347 P.2d 197,

1959 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 1959).

Stated

in

Town of Clearmont v. State Hwy. Comm'n, 357 P.2d 470,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo 1960).

Cited

in

State Hwy. Comm'n v. Rollins, 471 P.2d 324,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1970).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Compensation for Condemnation: Recent Wyoming Development,” see 17 Wyo. L.J. 246 (1963).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Governmental tort liability as to highway median barriers, 58 ALR4th 559.

§ 24-2-110.
Cooperation with counties in construction and maintenance of county roads; allocation of costs.

The board of county commissioners of each county shall establish a separate road construction and maintenance fund solely for the construction and maintenance of county roads, bridges and culverts. Work using funds from the road construction and maintenance fund of a county shall be performed under contract awarded after competitive bidding if the estimated cost of the work exceeds seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00). All work shall be performed under the immediate control and supervision of the board of county commissioners or its authorized representative and in accordance with county road standards as established by the Wyoming county road standards committee. The road construction and maintenance fund program is a supplement to federal aid, primary and secondary road programs in each county. The term “construction and maintenance” as used in this section means construction, reconstruction, surveys, mapping, right-of-way costs, bridges, culverts, general road maintenance and fencing. The county shall use existing grades, bridges and other physical items or facilities in order to minimize or avoid more costly relocation.

All expenses of maintaining the road after its construction is completed shall be paid by the county.

The gasoline license tax revenues distributed by the department of transportation under W.S. 39-17-111(d)(ii) shall be sent to the county treasurers of the various counties and placed in a separate fund in each county earning its own interest and be expended by the board of county commissioners solely for the road construction and maintenance fund program and as otherwise provided in this subsection. This money shall be allocated as follows:

To the highway fund, an amount equal to the counties’ contribution for the cost of the university’s technology transfer program under W.S. 21-17-115(a)(ii) or thirty-one thousand two hundred fifty dollars ($31,250.00), whichever is less;

The remainder to the counties and the share allocated to each county shall be based fifty percent (50%) upon the percentage ratio which the rural population including the population within the cities and towns with less than one thousand four hundred (1,400) of each county bears to the total rural population of the state and fifty percent (50%) based upon the percentage ratio which the area of each county bears to the area of the state. Any interest earned on the investment of monies in the fund created by this subsection shall be retained by each county and shall be used for project costs as authorized by this section.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 24, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 2.

There is created a Wyoming county road standards committee appointed by the governor consisting of:

Three (3) members nominated by an association representing Wyoming county commissioners, one (1) of whom shall be a registered professional engineer;

Two (2) members nominated by an association representing Wyoming consulting engineers and surveyors;

One (1) member nominated by an association representing Wyoming highway construction contractors; and

One (1) member nominated by an association representing Wyoming county engineers and road superintendents.

It shall be the responsibility of the Wyoming county roads standards committee to furnish standards for the construction and maintenance of county roads to any board of county commissioners upon request, and to advise boards of county commissioners with respect to highway construction, maintenance and improvements. The committee shall meet as necessary, but at least annually.

Whenever an emergency arises requiring construction or maintenance work using funds from the road construction and maintenance fund of a county, the board of county commissioners may enter into contract for the work without advertising for the letting of the contract. An emergency is an occasion requiring construction or maintenance work, on short notice, because the road has become unsafe or impassable due to events which are beyond the control of the county.

Of all funds credited to a county road construction and maintenance fund established pursuant to this section, a county may designate per year not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) of its unobligated share of the prior fiscal year’s county gasoline license tax allocation toward purchase or lease of motor graders.

History.

Laws 1919, ch. 132, § 6; C.S. 1920, § 3030; R.S. 1931, § 52-106; Laws 1945, ch. 152, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 48-107; Laws 1947, ch. 12, § 1; 1951, ch. 99, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 24-38; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1977, ch. 51, § 2; 1985, ch. 115, § 1; 1989, ch. 164, § 2; ch. 271, § 1; 1990, ch. 118, § 1; ch. 119, § 1; 1991, ch. 241, § 3; 1992, ch. 6, § 2; 1994, ch. 13, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 1999, ch. 139, § 1; 2005, ch. 105, § 1; 2007, ch. 119, § 1; 2008, ch. 24, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 170, §§ 1, 2; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2022 ch. 61, § 1, effective March 15, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to construction and maintenance to be performed at expense of state, see §

24-1-118

.

As to establishment, vacation or alteration of county highways, see chapter 3 of this title.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” for “twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00).”

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted variants of “and maintenance” after “construction” in (a), the introductory language of (c), (g), and (h); and inserted “general road maintenance” following “bridges, culverts” in the second from the last sentence of (a); and repealed former (d), pertaining to use of funds.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009,
in the first sentence, deleted “according to the last federal census” following “the total rural population of the state” in (c)(ii); and repealed (e), which read: “As used in subsection (c) of this section, ‘last federal census’ means the last official federal census conducted by the bureau of the census to become effective on July 1 next following the receipt of the official census figures.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “department of transportation” for “state treasurer” in the first sentence in (c).

The 2022 amendment

substituted “seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000.00)” for “fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00)” in the second sentence of (a); substituted “an association representing” for “the” in (f)(i) through (f)(iv); deleted “association” following “county commissioners” in (f)(i); deleted “association of” following “Wyoming” in (f)(ii); in (f)(iii), added “highway construction,” deleted “association” following “contractors”; deleted “association of” following “Wyoming” in (f)(iv); and added (j).

Laws 2022, ch. 61, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 15, 2022.

Legislative intent. —

Laws 1999, ch. 139, § 2, provides: “Effective January 1, 2000, all funds held by the department of transportation in the state-county road construction account for the counties shall be transferred to the respective counties, except the department may withhold the funds from any county having a negative balance for existing projects on that date until such time that the negative balance is eliminated and payment on existing contracts is complete.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009 ch 170 § 3 provides:

“(a) No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b) No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Appropriations. —

See Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 341, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, for various distributions from the general fund to local governments and state accounts.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.